Hawaii statutes.
§383-165 Saving clause, amendment, or
repeal. The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal all or any
part of this chapter at any time; and there shall be no vested private right of
any kind against such amendment or repeal. All the rights, privileges, or
immunities conferred by this chapter or by acts done pursuant thereto shall
exist subject to the power of the legislature to amend or repeal this chapter
at any time. [L 1939, c 219, §20; RL 1945, §4299; RL 1955, §93-154; HRS
§383-165]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next